en: Electronics > Electronics Accessories > Audio & Video Splitters & Switches > 3.5 mm Splitters & Switches: 3.5 mm Splitters; 3.5 mm Switches
el: Ηλεκτρονικά > Αξεσουάρ ηλεκτρονικών συσκευών > Διαχωριστές & διακόπτες ήχου & βίντεο > Διαχωριστές & διακόπτες 3.5 mm: Διαχωριστές 3.5 mm; Διακόπτες 3.5 mm
tr: Elektronik > Elektronik Alet Aksesuarları > Ses ve Görüntü Ayırıcıları ve Anahtarları > 3,5 mm Bölücüler ve Anahtarlar: 3,5 mm Bölücüler; 3,5 mm Anahtarlar
pl: Elektronika > Akcesoria elektroniczne > Rozdzielacze i przełączniki do przesyłania obrazu i dźwięku > Rozdzielacze i przełączniki 3,5 mm: Rozdzielacze 3,5 mm; Przełączniki 3,5 mm
it: Elettronica > Accessori dispositivi elettronici > Splitter e interruttori audio e video > Splitter e switch da 3,5 mm: Splitter da 3,5 mm; Switch da 3,5 mm
hu: Elektronika > Elektronikai kiegészítők > Audio- és videoelosztók és -kapcsolók > 3,5 mm-es elosztók és kapcsolók: 3,5 mm-es elosztók; 3,5 mm-es kapcsolók
es: Electrónica > Accesorios electrónicos > Divisores y conmutadores de audio y vídeo > Divisores y conmutadores de 3.5 mm: Divisores de 3.5 mm; Conmutadores de 3.5 mm
ja: 電子機器 > 電気製品関連用品・PC周辺機器 > AVスプリッター・スイッチ > 3.5mmスプリッター・スイッチャー: 3.5mmスプリッター; 3.5mmスイッチャー
pt-BR: Eletrônicos > Acessórios para eletrônicos > Divisores e comutadores de áudio e vídeo > Divisores e chaves de 3,5 mm: Divisores de 3,5 mm; Chaves de 3,5 mm
sv: Elektronik > Elektroniktillbehör > Kabeldelare och omkopplare för video och ljud > 3,5 mm-fördelare och omkopplare: 3,5 mm-fördelare; 3,5 mm-omkopplare
ko: 전자기기 > 전자기기 부대용품 > 오디오 및 비디오 스플리터/스위치 > 3.5mm 스플리터 및 스위치: 3.5mm 스플리터; 3.5mm 스위치
pt-PT: Eletrónica > Acessórios eletrónicos > Splitters e interrutores de áudio e vídeo > Divisores e comutadores de 3,5 mm: Divisores de 3,5 mm; Comutadores de 3,5 mm
nb: Elektronikk > Elektronikktilbehør > Lyd- og videosplittere og -brytere > 3,5 mm splittere og brytere: 3,5 mm splittere; 3,5 mm brytere
sl-SI: Elektronika > Elektronski dodatki > Avdio in video razdelilniki in preklopniki > 3,5 mm razdelilniki in preklopniki: 3,5 mm razdelilniki; 3,5 mm preklopniki
hr-HR: Elektronika > Pribor za elektroniku > Audio i video razdjelnici i sklopke > 3,5 mm razdjelnici i prekidači: 3,5 mm razdjelnici; 3,5 mm prekidači
th: อิเล็กทรอนิกส์ > อุปกรณ์อิเล็กทรอนิกส์ > สวิตช์และตลับแยก AV > ตัวแยกและสวิตช์ 3.5 มม.: ตัวแยกสัญญาณ 3.5 มม.; สวิตช์ 3.5 มม.
fi: Elektroniikka > Sähkötarvikkeet > AV-jakajat ja -kytkimet > 3,5 mm:n jakajat ja kytkimet: 3,5 mm:n jakajat; 3,5 mm:n kytkimet
zh-CN: 电子产品 > 电子配件 > 音频和视频分配器和切换器 > 3.5 毫米分路器和切换器: 3.5 毫米分路器; 3.5 毫米切换器
sk-SK: Elektronika > Elektronické príslušenstvo > Rozbočovače a prepínače zvuku a videa > 3,5 mm rozdeľovače a prepínače: 3,5 mm rozdeľovače; 3,5 mm prepínače
ru: Электроника > Аксессуары для электроники > Разветвители и коммутаторы аудио- и видеосигналов > Разветвители и переключатели 3,5 мм: Разветвители 3,5 мм; Переключатели 3,5 мм
de: Elektronik > Elektronisches Zubehör > Audio- und Video-Splitter & -Switches > 3,5-mm-Splitter und -Switches: 3,5-mm-Splitter; 3,5-mm-Switches
bg-BG: Електроника > Аксесоари за електроника > Аудио- и видеосплитери и превключватели > 3.5 mm сплитери и превключватели: 3.5 mm сплитери; 3.5 mm превключватели
da: Elektronik > Elektronik – tilbehør > Lyd og video – fordelere og omskiftere > 3,5 mm-fordelere og -omskiftere: 3,5 mm fordelere; 3,5 mm fordelere
nl: Elektronica > Accessoires voor elektronica > Audio-/videosplitters en -schakelaars > 3.5 mm splitters en switches: 3.5 mm splitters; 3.5 mm switches
ro-RO: Electronice > Accesorii electronice > Splittere și comutatoare audio și video > Splittere și switch-uri de 3,5 mm: Splittere de 3,5 mm; Switch-uri de 3,5 mm
lt-LT: Elektronika > Elektronikos priedai > Garso ir vaizdo skirstytuvai ir jungikliai > 3,5 mm skirstytuvai ir jungikliai: 3,5 mm skirstytuvai; 3,5 mm jungikliai
fr: Appareil électronique > Accessoires électroniques > Répartiteurs et commutateurs audio et vidéo > Répartiteurs et commutateurs 3,5 mm: Répartiteurs 3,5 mm; Commutateurs 3,5 mm
vi: Thiết bị điện tử > Phụ kiện thiết bị điện tử > Bộ chia và công tắc âm thanh và hình ảnh > Bộ tách và công tắc 3.5mm: Bộ tách 3.5mm; Công tắc 3.5mm
zh-TW: 電子器材 > 電子配件 > AV 分配器/切換器 > 3.5 mm 分配器與切換器: 3.5 mm 分配器; 3.5 mm 切換器
cs: Elektronika > Elektronika – příslušenství > AV rozbočovače a přepínače > Rozbočovače a přepínače pro 3,5mm jack: Rozbočovače pro 3,5mm jack; Přepínače pro 3,5mm jack